Tennessee, session 114, HB0957.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-813(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(a)
(1) In addition to leave granted under §§ 8-50-801, 8-50-802, and 8-50-
806, an eligible employee must be granted absence from work with pay for a
period of time equal to six (6) workweeks because of the birth of the employee's
child, because of the placement of a child with the employee for adoption, or
because the employee becomes the foster parent of a minor child, and upon the
employee giving thirty-days' notice to the appropriate appointing authority. If the
eligible employee learns of the birth, adoption, or foster placement less than thirty
(30) days in advance, the employee shall give the notice as soon as reasonably
possible. For the purpose of calculating service anniversary dates, this absence
from work is considered full-time employment.
(2) An employee who becomes the foster parent of a minor child must
not continue to utilize leave granted under this subsection (a) once the minor
child is no longer placed in the foster parent's home or custody.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-813, is amended by deleting
subsections (d) and (e) and substituting:
HB0957
002919
- 1 -

(d) An eligible employee must not be granted more than six (6) workweeks of
paid leave under subsection (a) during a twelve-month period, but the workweeks do not
need to be taken consecutively. An eligible employee may receive no more than six (6)
workweeks of paid leave during a twelve-month period, even if there is more than one
(1) qualifying birth, adoption, or foster placement under subsection (a). If an eligible
employee uses only a fraction of the leave granted under subsection (a), then the
eligible employee may use the remaining balance of leave for any qualifying birth,
adoption, or foster placement that occurs within the same twelve-month period. Leave
granted pursuant to this section must be used within twelve (12) months of the qualifying
birth, adoption, or initial foster placement.
(e) As used in this section:
(1) "Eligible employee" means:
(A) An employee who has been employed full-time with the state
for at least twelve (12) consecutive months with an entity described in §§
8-30-102(a), 8-30-102(b)(2), 8-30-102(b)(6)-(7), and 8-30-102(b)(10)-(13);
or
(B) An employee who has been employed full-time with the state
for at least twelve (12) consecutive months with an entity described in §
8-30-102(b)(9), except for an employee of any administrative board or
commission that is attached to an entity described in § 8-30-102(b)(1) or
§ 8-30-102(b)(3)-(5); and
(2) "Foster parent" has the same meaning as defined in § 37-2-414
(a)(2).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002919